Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 8. Accounts.

§ 6.2-1358.
Share accounts.

Every credit union may issue shares to and maintain share accounts for any member qualified pursuant to the credit union’s bylaws.

Shares and share accounts may be withdrawn for payment to the account holder or to third parties in such manner and in accordance with such procedures as may be established by the board of directors.

Shares and share accounts shall be subject to any withdrawal notice requirement that may be imposed pursuant to the credit union bylaws.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-214; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-206; 1968, c. 560; 1975, c. 33; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.41; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1359.
Payment for shares; transfers; lien on shares.

Shares shall be paid for in money. Shares may be subscribed to, paid for, and transferred in such manner as the bylaws prescribe. The credit union shall have a lien on the shares, including share accounts of a member in his individual, joint, or trust accounts and upon any dividends payable thereon as security for all debts and obligations owed by, and for any loan endorsed by, such member to the credit union.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-214; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-206; 1968, c. 560; 1975, c. 33; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.42; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1360.
Dividends.

At such intervals and for such periods as the bylaws provide and after provision for the required reserves, the board of directors may declare dividends on share accounts from the undivided earnings or other funds set aside for dividends.

Dividends may be paid at different rates on different types of share accounts and at different rates and maturity dates in the case of share certificates.

Dividend credit may be accrued on shares as authorized by the board of directors.

The rates of dividends and terms of payment may be declared in advance by the board of directors.

In no event shall a dividend be paid if, after the payment thereof, the liabilities of the credit union would exceed its assets.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-228; 1964, c. 75; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-219; 1968, c. 560; 1976, c. 202; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.43; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1361.
Ascertaining value of assets.

In ascertaining the value of the assets of a credit union:

A loan delinquent for more than two but less than six months shall be valued at 90 percent of the unpaid balance;

A loan delinquent for six months but less than 12 months shall be valued at 75 percent of the unpaid balance; and

A loan delinquent for 12 months or more shall be treated as of no value.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-228; 1964, c. 75; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-219; 1968, c. 560; 1976, c. 202; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.44; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1362.
Minors’ accounts.

A credit union may issue shares in the name of a minor as the sole and absolute owner of such shares and may accept the purchase of such shares by and for such owner, pay withdrawals from such share accounts, and act in any other manner with respect to such share accounts on the order of such minor. Any withdrawal of shares or delivery of funds from such account to the owner thereof, or payment of a share draft or other written order for withdrawal signed by such minor owner, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the credit union for any payment, withdrawal, or delivery so made. The parent or guardian of such minor shall not in his capacity as parent or guardian have the power to withdraw or transfer shares in any such account unless the minor has given written notice to the credit union to accept the signature of such parent or guardian.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-215; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-207; 1968, c. 560; 1972, c. 825; 1979, c. 407; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.45; 2006, c. 755; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1363.
Individual retirement accounts and retirement or pension plans.

A credit union may act as trustee or custodian of (i) individual retirement accounts established with the credit union for the benefit of its members under the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406, 88 Stat. 829) (ERISA), as amended from time to time; (ii) pension funds of self-employed individuals or of a company or organization sponsoring the credit union; or (iii) other similar retirement or pension plans.

Contributions to and earnings on an account described in clause (i) of subsection A may be accepted and retained in accordance with ERISA but shall be invested in shares of the credit union. If the credit union bylaws so provide such accounts may be established for the benefit of members in the names of other trustees or custodians who are qualified to serve as such under the laws of this Commonwealth and ERISA.

History.

1976, c. 205, § 6.1-207.1; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.46; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1364.
Acceptance of money under Virginia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

A credit union may accept money paid to it pursuant to the Virginia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (§

64.2-1900

et seq.) for credit to an account in the name of the custodian as provided in such Act if the custodian or the minor for whose benefit the transfer is made is a member of the credit union.

History.

1979, c. 138, § 6.1-207.2; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.47; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “the Virginia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (§ 31-37 et seq.)” was changed to “the Virginia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (§

64.2-1900

et seq.)” to conform to the recodification of Title 31 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 6.2-1365.
Accounts of deceased or incapacitated person.

A credit union may pay any share balance due a deceased person or any person under a disability to the personal representative, guardian, conservator, curator, or committee of such person upon proper proof of the appointment and qualification of such fiduciary. Such qualification shall be sufficient authority for making such payment. A credit union making such payment shall no longer be liable for the amount so paid to any person. The presentation of a duly certified letter or certificate of qualification as personal representative, or other fiduciary, guardian, conservator, curator, or committee shall be conclusive proof of the jurisdiction of the court issuing the same.

A credit union that has received no written notice and does not have actual notice that a member is deceased or has been adjudicated incapacitated, may pay or deliver shares in such member’s account in accordance with the provisions of the account contract without liability to any person for the amounts so paid.

History.

1968, c. 560, § 6.1-208.3; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.48; 1997, c. 801; 2010, c. 794.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-441 Certificate/Letter of Qualification; No. 15-451 Affidavit Under Virginia Small Estate Act.

§ 6.2-1366.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 269, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 269 repealed former § 6.1-225.49, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 4, the 2010 repeal by c. 269 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

Former § 6.1-225.49, authorizing payment of small balances to distributees or other persons, derived from Acts 1968, c. 560, § 6.1-208.4; 1976, c. 203; 1981, c. 330; 1986, c. 334; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.49; 1997, c. 278; 2002, cc. 187, 220, 227.

§ 6.2-1367.
Application of provisions to federal credit unions.

The provisions of §§

6.2-1365

,

64.2-601

, and

64.2-602

shall apply to federal credit unions operating in the Commonwealth to the extent that the same are not inconsistent with any federal law applicable to such credit unions.

History.

1968, c. 560, § 6.1-208.5; 1979, c. 407; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.50; 2010, cc. 269, 794; 2013, cc. 7, 95.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 269 amended former § 6.1-225.50, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2010 amendment by c. 269 has been given effect in this section as set out above, by substituting “64.1-132.3” for “6.2-1366.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 7 and 95 are identical, and substituted “§§

6.2-1365

,

64.2-601

, and

64.2-602

” for “§§

6.2-1365

and 64.1-132.3” and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

§ 6.2-1368.
Accounts of fiduciaries.

A credit union may issue shares and maintain share accounts in the name of any person or entity eligible for membership in such credit union pursuant to §

6.2-1327

as administrator, executor, custodian, conservator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary for a named beneficiary. The payment of funds from any such account pursuant to a share draft or other written order of withdrawal signed by the fiduciary, the delivery of funds in such account to such fiduciary, or a receipt signed by any such fiduciary with regard to the payment of funds from such account, shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of the credit union for the payment or delivery so made.

History.

2000, c. 744, § 6.1-225.50:1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1369.
Credit union need not inquire as to fiduciary funds used to purchase shares in fiduciary’s personal account.

If any fiduciary or agent purchases shares in a credit union in his own name (i) with share drafts or other instruments drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary, (ii) with share drafts or other instruments drawn by him upon an account in the name of his principal, if he is empowered to draw share drafts or other instruments thereto, or (iii) with share drafts or other instruments payable to his principal and endorsed by him as fiduciary, the credit union issuing such shares shall not be bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of his obligation as fiduciary.

The credit union is authorized to pay the amount of the shares issued or any part thereof upon the withdrawal by the fiduciary without being liable to the principal, unless the credit union receives payment for the shares or pays the withdrawal (i) with the actual knowledge that the fiduciary, in purchasing such shares or in making such withdrawal, is committing a breach of his obligation as a fiduciary, or (ii) with knowledge of such facts that its action in issuing the shares or paying the withdrawal amounts to bad faith.

History.

2000, c. 744, § 6.1-225.50:2; 2010, c. 794.